Utah statutes.
63H-1-405.   Project area budget.

(1)  Before the authority may receive or use tax increment, the authority board shall prepare and adopt a project area budget.

(2)  The authority board may amend an adopted project area budget as and when the authority board considers it appropriate.



Enacted by Chapter 92, 2009 General Session

